New York, session 2025-2026, A7237.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 1113 of the insurance law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph 36 to read as follows: 3 (36) "Real estate value assurance insurance" means insurance against 4 loss of real estate value specifically attributable to local rezoning or 5 significant changes in land use within their neighborhood that are not 6 related to broader economic downturns. 7 § 2. Subsection (a) of section 2105 of the insurance law, as separate- 8 ly amended by chapters 369 and 569 of the laws of 2024, is amended to 9 read as follows: 10 (a) The superintendent may issue an excess line broker's license to 11 any person, firm, association or corporation who or which is licensed as 12 an insurance broker under section two thousand one hundred four of this 13 article, or who or which is licensed as an excess line broker in the 14 licensee's home state, provided, however, that the applicant's home 15 state grants non-resident licenses to residents of this state on the 16 same basis, except that reciprocity is not required in regard to the 17 placement of liability insurance on behalf of a purchasing group or any 18 of its members; authorizing such person, firm, association or corpo- 19 ration to procure, subject to the restrictions herein provided, policies 20 of insurance from insurers that are not authorized to transact business 21 in this state of the kind or kinds of insurance specified in paragraphs 22 four through fourteen, sixteen, seventeen, nineteen, twenty, twenty-two, 23 twenty-seven, twenty-eight, thirty-one, thirty-two, thirty-three, [and] 24 thirty-four and thirty-six of subsection (a) of section one thousand one 25 hundred thirteen of this chapter and in subsection (h) of this section, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10998-01-5 A. 7237 2 1 provided, however, that the provisions of this section and section two 2 thousand one hundred eighteen of this article shall not apply to ocean 3 marine insurance and other contracts of insurance enumerated in 4 subsections (b) and (c) of section two thousand one hundred seventeen of 5 this article. Such license may be suspended or revoked by the super- 6 intendent whenever in the superintendent's judgment such suspension or 7 revocation will best promote the interests of the people of this state. 8 § 3. Subsection (a) of section 4101 of the insurance law, as amended 9 by chapter 369 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 10 (a) "Basic kinds of insurance" means the kinds of insurance described 11 in the following paragraphs of subsection (a) of section one thousand 12 one hundred thirteen of this chapter numbered therein as set forth in 13 parentheses below: 14 fire (4); 15 burglary and theft (7); 16 glass (8); 17 boiler and machinery (9); 18 elevator (10); 19 animal (11); 20 personal injury liability (13); 21 property damage liability (14) - basic as to stock companies only; 22 workers' compensation and employers' liability (15); 23 fidelity and surety (16); 24 credit (17); 25 marine and inland marine (20); 26 marine protection and indemnity (21) - basic as to mutual companies 27 only; 28 business interruption insurance (34); 29 real estate value assurance (36). 30 § 4. Group A of table one of paragraph 1 of subsection (a) of section 31 4103 of the insurance law, as amended by chapter 369 of the laws of 32 2024, is amended to read as follows: 33 Group A: 34 7 $300,000 $150,000 35 8, 9, 10, 11, or 14 - for each such kind $100,000 $ 50,000 36 13 or 15 - for each such kind $500,000 $250,000 37 16 $900,000 $450,000 38 17 $400,000 $200,000 39 Basic additional amount 40 required for any one 41 or more of the above 42 kinds of insurance $100,000 $ 50,000 43 3(i), 3(ii), 6{1} or 12{2} - for each 44 such kind $100,000 $ 50,000 45 22 $2,000,000 $1,000,000 46 24 $400,000 $200,000 47 26(B) $200,000 $100,000 48 26(A), 26(C) or 26(D) - 49 for each such kind $600,000 $300,000 50 27 $300,000 $150,000 51 28 $2,000,000 $1,000,000 52 30 $400,000 $200,000 53 31 $100,000 $ 50,000 54 32 $100,000 $ 50,000 A. 7237 3 1 33 $100,000 $ 50,000 2 34 $2,000,000 [$1,000,0000] 3 $1,000,000 4 36 $2,000,000 $1,000,000 5 § 5. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 6 have become a law.